Maine, session 132, LD110.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §203-D is enacted to read:
§203-D. Reporting on funds received by direct share subdivisions pursuant to court
settlement of opioid crisis litigation
A direct share subdivision that receives funds pursuant to settlements described in
section II.A of the Memoranda of Understanding shall submit a report to the Attorney
General by January 15, 2026, and annually thereafter, detailing the amount of such funds
received pursuant to section II.C.2 of each Memoranda of Understanding and expended in
the prior calendar year, including a description of each such expenditure. The Attorney
General shall compile these reports and submit them by February 15, 2026 and annually
thereafter to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health
and human services matters.
As used in this section, "Memoranda of Understanding" has the same meaning as in
section 203-C, subsection 1, paragraph C and "direct share subdivision" means a
municipality or county that is a subdivision identified in Exhibit 3 of the Memoranda of
Understanding.
Page 1 - 132LR0033(03)